test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-n_23ii_assii_oahpa-gt-norm-dial_Var.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - asia ok: # Noun 'sak'
     assii+Dial/Var+N+Sg+Nom: asia
     assii+Dial/Var+N+Sg+Gen: asian
     assii+Dial/Var+N+Sg+Par: asiaa
     assii+Dial/Var+N+Sg+Tra: asiaksi
     assii+Dial/Var+N+Sg+Abe: asiatta
     assii+Dial/Var+N+Sg+Ine: asiassa
     assii+Dial/Var+N+Sg+Ela: asiasta
     assii+Dial/Var+N+Sg+Ill: asihaan
     assii+Dial/Var+N+Sg+Ade: asialla
     assii+Dial/Var+N+Sg+Abl: asialta
     assii+Dial/Var+N+Sg+All: asialle
     assii+Dial/Var+N+Sg+Ess: asianna
     assii+Dial/Var+N+Pl+Nom: asiat
     assii+Dial/Var+N+Pl+Gen: asioitten
     assii+Dial/Var+N+Pl+Par: asioita
     assii+Dial/Var+N+Pl+Tra: asioiksi
     assii+Dial/Var+N+Pl+Abe: asioitta
     assii+Dial/Var+N+Pl+Ine: asioissa
     assii+Dial/Var+N+Pl+Ela: asioista
     assii+Dial/Var+N+Pl+Ill: asioihin # asihoin?
     assii+Dial/Var+N+Pl+Ade: asioila
     assii+Dial/Var+N+Pl+Abl: asioilta
     assii+Dial/Var+N+Pl+All: asioile
     assii+Dial/Var+N+Pl+Ess: asioina
     assii+Dial/Var+N+Pl+Com: asioine
